Utah statutes.
77-4-1.   Force by officer -- Arrest.
A public officer authorized to execute process issued by any court may use
such force as is reasonable and necessary to execute service of process. If
necessary, he may seize, arrest, and confine persons resisting or aiding and
abetting resistance to his service of process.
